test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V_1а_Impf_читать_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - читать : # Verb - full paradigm
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Inf: чита́ть
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg: чита́л
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg: чита́ло
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg: чита́ла
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Pl: чита́ли

    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1: чита́ю
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2: чита́ешь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3: чита́ет
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1: чита́ем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2: чита́ете
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3: чита́ют
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Imp+Sg2: чита́й
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Imp+Pl2: чита́йте
    
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Inf+Pass: чита́ться
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg+Pass: чита́лся
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg+Pass: чита́лось
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg+Pass: чита́лась
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Pst+Pl+Pass: чита́лись

    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg1+Pass+Fac: чита́юсь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg2+Pass+Fac: чита́ешься
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Sg3+Pass: чита́ется
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl1+Pass+Fac: чита́емся
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl2+Pass+Fac: чита́етесь
    читать+V+Impf+TV+Prs+Pl3+Pass: чита́ются

    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Adv: чита́я
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: чита́в
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: чита́вши
    
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Inf: чита́ть
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Msc+Sg: чита́л
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Neu+Sg: чита́ло
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Fem+Sg: чита́ла
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Pst+Pl: чита́ли

    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg1: чита́ю
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg2: чита́ешь
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Sg3: чита́ет
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl1: чита́ем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl2: чита́ете
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Prs+Pl3: чита́ют
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Imp+Sg2: чита́й
    читать+V+Impf+IV+Imp+Pl2: чита́йте
    
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Adv: чита́я
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: чита́в
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: чита́вши
    
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Nom+Sg: чита́ющий
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Acc+Sg+Inan: чита́ющий
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Acc+Sg+Anim: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Gen+Sg: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Loc+Sg: чита́ющем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Dat+Sg: чита́ющему
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Msc+Ins+Sg: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Nom+Sg: чита́ющее
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Acc+Sg: чита́ющее
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Gen+Sg: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Loc+Sg: чита́ющем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Dat+Sg: чита́ющему
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Neu+Ins+Sg: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Nom+Sg: чита́ющая
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Acc+Sg: чита́ющую
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Gen+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Loc+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Dat+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Fem+Ins+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Nom+Pl: чита́ющие
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Acc+Pl+Inan: чита́ющие
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Acc+Pl+Anim: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Gen+Pl: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Loc+Pl: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Dat+Pl: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsAct+Ins+Pl: чита́ющими

    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Nom+Sg: чита́ющий
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Acc+Sg+Inan: чита́ющий
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Acc+Sg+Anim: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Gen+Sg: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Loc+Sg: чита́ющем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Dat+Sg: чита́ющему
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Msc+Ins+Sg: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Nom+Sg: чита́ющее
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Acc+Sg: чита́ющее
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Gen+Sg: чита́ющего
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Loc+Sg: чита́ющем
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Dat+Sg: чита́ющему
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Neu+Ins+Sg: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Nom+Sg: чита́ющая
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Acc+Sg: чита́ющую
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Gen+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Loc+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Dat+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Fem+Ins+Sg: чита́ющей
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Nom+Pl: чита́ющие
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Acc+Pl+Inan: чита́ющие
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Acc+Pl+Anim: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Gen+Pl: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Loc+Pl: чита́ющих
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Dat+Pl: чита́ющим
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PrsAct+Ins+Pl: чита́ющими

    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Nom+Sg: чита́емый
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Acc+Sg+Inan: чита́емый
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Acc+Sg+Anim: чита́емого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Gen+Sg: чита́емого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Loc+Sg: чита́емом
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Dat+Sg: чита́емому
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Ins+Sg: чита́емым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Nom+Sg: чита́емое
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Acc+Sg: чита́емое
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Gen+Sg: чита́емого
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Loc+Sg: чита́емом
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Dat+Sg: чита́емому
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Ins+Sg: чита́емым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Nom+Sg: чита́емая
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Acc+Sg: чита́емую
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Gen+Sg: чита́емой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Loc+Sg: чита́емой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Dat+Sg: чита́емой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Ins+Sg: чита́емой
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Nom+Pl: чита́емые
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Acc+Pl+Inan: чита́емые
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Acc+Pl+Anim: чита́емых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Gen+Pl: чита́емых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Loc+Pl: чита́емых
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Dat+Pl: чита́емым
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Ins+Pl: чита́емыми
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Msc+Sg+Pred: чита́ем
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Neu+Sg+Pred: чита́емо
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Fem+Sg+Pred: чита́ема
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PrsPss+Pl+Pred: чита́емы

    
